Utah statutes.
16-6a-113.   Certificates issued by the division.

(1)  Any person may apply to the division for:

(a)  a certificate of existence for a domestic nonprofit corporation;

(b)  a certificate of authorization for a foreign nonprofit corporation; or

(c)  a certificate that sets forth any facts of record in the division.

(2)  A certificate of existence or certificate of authorization sets forth:

(a) (i)  the domestic nonprofit corporation's corporate name; or

(ii)  the foreign nonprofit corporation's corporate name registered in this state;

(b)  that:

(i) (A)  the domestic nonprofit corporation is incorporated under the law of this state; and

(B)  the date of its incorporation; or

(ii)  the foreign nonprofit corporation is authorized to conduct affairs in this state;

(c)  that all fees, taxes, and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if:

(i)  payment is reflected in the records of the division; and

(ii)  nonpayment affects the existence or authorization of the domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation;

(d)  that the domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation's most recent annual report required by Section 16-6a-1607 has been filed by the division;

(e)  that articles of dissolution have not been filed by the division; and

(f)  other facts of record in the division that may be requested by the applicant.

(3)  Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate issued by the division may be relied upon as conclusive evidence of the facts set forth in the certificate.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

